apertium-yua.yua.twol
Alphabet
 
 ʼ A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u w x y z
%{V%}:a %{V%}:e %{V%}:i %{V%}:o %{V%}:u
 %>:%> %{wy%}:y %{wy%}:w %{wy%}:0 
 %{l%}:l %{l%}:0 %{h%}:h %{h%}:0 
%{k%}:k %{k%}:0 ;


Sets

Vow   = A E I O U 
        Á É Í Ó Ú
        À È Ì Ò Ù
        a e i o u 
        á é í ó ú
        à è ì ò ù ;

UnaccVow = A E I O U 
           a e i o u ;

Cns   = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t w x y z ;


Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Vowel harmony"
%{V%}:Vx <=> Vx [Cns | %>:0 | ʼ]+ %>:0 _ ; where Vx in UnaccVow ;

"Insert glottal between adjacent vowels of different morphemes" !not working
0:ʼ <=> Vow %>:0 _ Vow ;

"Reduce homomorphic k-geminates across morpheme boundary" !note: should this be in spellrelax?
k:0 <=> k %>:0 _ ;

"Reduce homomorphic t-geminates across morpheme boundary" !note: should this be in spellrelax?
t:0 <=> t %>:0 _ ;

"Remove w before consonant (they are over generated)"
w:0 <=> # _ Cns ;

"Remove y before consonant (they are over generated)"
y:0 <=> # _ Cns ;
